Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-67] Oaths. (a) The law
officer, interpreters, and, in general and special courts-martial, members,
trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, assistant defense
counsel, and reporters shall take an oath or affirmation in the presence of the
accused to perform their duties faithfully.

(b) Each witness before a military court shall
be examined on oath or affirmation. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next